Mississippi, session 2026, SB2733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) Many Mississippi seniors are working past the age of 65 and keeping their group coverage because without a second income they cannot function economically on Social Security only.  It is the purpose of this act to provide Medicare-eligible Mississippians with guaranteed issue rights to obtain a Medicare supplement policy upon the loss, material reduction or voluntary termination of creditable group health or Medicaid coverage, without regard to fault or health status. (2)  The Mississippi Commissioner of Insurance shall promulgate rules and regulations to require health insurance companies in the State of Mississippi to offer Medicare-eligible individuals with guaranteed issue rights to apply for a Medicare supplement policy upon the loss, material reduction or voluntary termination of creditable group health or Medicaid coverage without regard to fault or health status and cannot deny the application or charge more based upon the individual's health.  The commissioner shall require the transition from employer coverage to Medicare Supplement coverage using guaranteed issue rights. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.